Maryland, session 2026, HB1353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
4–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(u) “Vital record” means a certificate or report of birth, death, fetal death,
marriage, divorce, dissolution or annulment of marriage, adoption, or adjudication of
paternity that is required by law to be filed with the Secretary.
4–217.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided by law:
(i) The Department shall collect a $12 fee:
1. For each certified or abridged copy of a fetal death,
marriage, or divorce verification certificate;
2. For a report that a search of the fetal death, marriage, or
divorce verification certificate files was made and the requested record is not on file;
3. For each change to a fetal death, marriage, or divorce
verification certificate made later than 1 year after the certificate has been registered with
the Department; or
4. To process an adoption, foreign adoption, or legitimation;

HOUSE BILL 1353 3
(ii) The Department shall collect a $10 fee:
1. Except as provided in paragraph (6)(ii) of this subsection,
for each certified or abridged copy of a birth certificate;
2. For the first copy of a certified or abridged death certificate
issued in a single transaction;
3. For a report that a search of the birth or death certificate
files was made and the requested record is not on file; or
4. For each change to a birth or death certificate made later
than 1 year after the certificate has been registered with the Department; and
(iii) The Department shall collect a $12 fee for each additional
certified or abridged copy of a death certificate provided concurrently with an initial
requested death certificate.
(2) From the fee the Department collects under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Department shall transfer the entire fee to the General Fund.
(3) (i) Any local health department or the Motor Vehicle
Administration may set and collect a fee for processing and issuing a birth certificate or
death certificate, or for a report that a search of the files was made and the requested record
is not on file, that covers:
1. The administrative costs of providing this service; and
2. The requirements of subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph.
(ii) The fee set by the local health department or the Motor Vehicle
Administration for processing and issuing a birth certificate or for a report under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may not exceed the actual costs to the local health
department or the Motor Vehicle Administration for processing and issuing a birth
certificate or death certificate or a report.
(iii) From the fee the local health department or the Motor Vehicle
Administration collects under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, $10 shall be transferred
to the General Fund.
(iv) Prior to setting and collecting a fee for processing and issuing a
birth certificate or death certificate or for a report under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph,
the local health department or the Motor Vehicle Administration shall enter into a
memorandum of understanding with the Maryland Department of Health that outlines the
local health department’s or the Motor Vehicle Administration’s fee structure.

HOUSE BILL 1353
(4) The Department, a local health department, or the Motor Vehicle
Administration may collect a fee for a certificate requested by an agency of the State or any
of its political subdivisions.
(5) The Secretary may waive all or part of a fee if chargeable to an agency
of the United States.
(6) (i) The Department may not collect a fee for a copy of a vital record
issued to:
1. A current or former member of the uniformed services; or
2. The surviving spouse or child of the member, if the copy
will be used in connection with a claim for a dependent or beneficiary of the member.
(ii) 1. In this subparagraph, “homeless individual” has the
meaning stated in INCLUDES HOMELESS CHILDREN AND YOUTHS, AS DEFINED IN the
federal McKinney–Vento Homeless [Education] Assistance [Improvements] Act [of 2001].
2. Subject to subsubparagraph 4 of this subparagraph, the
Department may not collect a fee for a [certified or an abridged copy of a birth certificate]
VITAL RECORD issued to a homeless individual.
3. The Department shall accept as proof of homelessness a
signed written statement from a homeless services provider located in the State OR, AS
SPECIFIED IN THE FEDERAL MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT, A
LOCAL EDUCATIONAL AGENCY LIAISON OR ANY DESIGNATED SCHOOL PERSONNEL
that:
A. Affirms that the individual is homeless; and
B. Includes the address to which the copy of the [birth
certificate] VITAL RECORD requested under this section may be sent.
4. A homeless individual may receive one copy of a [birth
certificate] VITAL RECORD without a fee in a single transaction.
5. The Department shall adopt regulations to implement this
subparagraph.
(iii) The Department may not collect a fee for a certified or abridged
copy of a death certificate of a first responder, as defined in § 18–213.2 of this article, killed
in the line of duty, if the copy is issued to a surviving spouse or child of the first responder
and will be used in connection with a claim for a dependent or beneficiary of the first
responder.

HOUSE BILL 1353 5
Article – Transportation
13–903.
(a) The following vehicles are exempt from the registration fees specified in this
subtitle:
(1) A vehicle that is owned and operated by the United States, this State,
or any political subdivision of this State;
(2) A vehicle that is owned by a volunteer fire company incorporated in this
State or by a rescue squad and that is used for firefighting or ambulance purposes;
(3) A canteen wagon of a recognized fire buff organization, as certified by
the International Fire Buffs Association;
(4) A vehicle owned and operated by the Civil Air Patrol;
(5) A vehicle owned and operated by a unit of a national veterans’
organization;
(6) A vehicle owned and operated by a Maryland chapter of the American
Red Cross;
(7) A motor vehicle and trailer known as the “40–8 box car” that is owned
and operated only for social or charitable purposes by any voiture of the Forty and Eight of
the American Legion, Department of Maryland;
(8) A vehicle owned by, or leased to, and personally used by a veteran who:
(i) As designated or classified by the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs, has lost the use of a hand, arm, or leg, or is totally disabled; or
(ii) Has a permanent impairment of both eyes so that:
1. The central visual acuity is 20/200 or less in the better eye,
with corrective glasses; or
2. There is a field defect in which the peripheral field has
contracted to such an extent that the widest diameter of visual field subtends an angular
distance no greater than 20 degrees in the better eye;
(9) A vehicle owned and personally used by an individual who is the
surviving spouse of a deceased disabled veteran, as defined under § 7–208 of the
Tax – Property Article; [and]

HOUSE BILL 1353
(10) A Type I or Type II school vehicle owned and operated by a religious
organization; AND
(11) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A VEHICLE
OWNED AND PERSONALLY USED BY A HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL.
(B) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN THE FEDERAL MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE
ACT.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (A)(11) OF THIS SECTION, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL ACCEPT AS PROOF OF HOMELESSNESS A SIGNED WRITTEN
STATEMENT FROM A HOMELESS SERVICES PROVIDER LOCATED IN THE STATE THAT:
(I) AFFIRMS THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS HOMELESS; AND
(II) INCLUDES AN ADDRESS TO WHICH A REGISTRATION CARD
AND REGISTRATION PLATES MAY BE SENT.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) The Administration may exempt from the registration fees specified in this
subtitle any vehicle of a law enforcement agency of the United States or of any other state,
if the United States or other state provides a reciprocal exemption for law enforcement
vehicles of this State.
[(c)] (D) (1) Each registered vehicle that is exempt from registration fees
under subsection (a) of this section shall display a special identification marker approved
by the Administrator.
(2) The special identification marker for a motor vehicle and trailer exempt
under subsection (a)(7) of this section shall bear the number of the organization and the
number of the local voiture, reading “40–8–(local number)”.
(3) The special identification marker for a vehicle exempt under subsection
(a)(8)(i) of this section shall indicate that the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs has
designated or classified the veteran as having lost the use of a hand, arm, or leg or as being
totally disabled.
[(d)] (E) A disabled veteran whose vehicle is eligible for exemption under
subsection (a)(8) of this section may, if eligible, receive the special registration number and
special registration plates provided under § 13–616, § 13–617, § 13–618, § 13–619, §
13–619.1, or § 13–619.2 of this title without payment of the registration fees specified in
this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1353 7
16–105.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to an individual who:
(i) Seeks to obtain an original driver’s license under this subtitle;
and
(ii) Does not qualify for a learner’s instructional permit under
subsection (e) of this section.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, an individual
under the age of 19 years who holds a learner’s instructional permit may not take a driver
skills examination or driver road examination for a provisional license:
(i) Sooner than 9 months following the later of:
1. The date that the individual first obtains the learner’s
instructional permit; or
2. The most recent date the individual was convicted of, or
granted probation before judgment under § 6–220 of the Criminal Procedure Article for, a
moving violation;
(ii) Until after successful completion of:
1. The driver education program approved under Subtitle 5
of this title, consisting of at least 30 hours of classroom instruction and at least 6 hours of
highway driving instruction; and
2. At least 60 hours, 10 hours of which must occur during the
period beginning 30 minutes before sunset and ending 30 minutes after sunrise, of
behind–the–wheel driving practice supervised by an individual who:
A. Holds a valid driver’s license;
B. Is at least 21 years old; and
C. Has been licensed to drive for at least 3 years; and
(iii) Unless the individual submits, in accordance with the
Administration’s regulations, a completed skills log book signed by:
1. Each supervising driver who certifies that the individual
has satisfactorily demonstrated a required skill and has completed the driving practice
requirements of item (ii)2 of this paragraph; and

HOUSE BILL 1353
2. If a signature of a parent, guardian, or other person is
required under § 16–107 of this subtitle, the parent, guardian, or other person who signs
the individual’s application under that section.
(3) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “UNACCOMPANIED HOMELESS
YOUTH” MEANS A CHILD OR YOUTH WHO:
1. IS NOT IN THE PHYSICAL CUSTODY OF A PARENT OR
GUARDIAN;
2. IS A HOMELESS CHILD OR YOUTH, AS DEFINED BY THE
FEDERAL MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT; AND
3. WAS DETERMINED TO BE A HOMELESS CHILD OR
YOUTH BY:
A. A MARYLAND LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM HOMELESS
LIAISON, AS DEFINED BY AS SPECIFIED IN THE FEDERAL MCKINNEY–VENTO
HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT, A LOCAL EDUCATIONAL AGENCY LIAISON OR ANY
DESIGNATED SCHOOL PERSONNEL;
B. A DIRECTOR OR A DESIGNEE OF THE DIRECTOR OF A
MARYLAND–BASED PROGRAM FUNDED UNDER THE RUNAWAY AND HOMELESS
YOUTH ACT; OR
C. A DIRECTOR OR A DESIGNEE OF THE DIRECTOR OF A
MARYLAND–BASED PROGRAM FUNDED UNDER TITLE IV, SUBTITLE B OF THE
MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT.
(II) An individual who holds a learner’s instructional permit and who
is 18 years old and has a high school diploma or its equivalent [or], is at least 19 years old
but under the age of 25 years, OR IS AN UNACCOMPANIED A HOMELESS YOUTH WHO
HOLDS A LEARNER’S INSTRUCTIONAL PERMIT AND IS UNDER THE AGE OF 19 YEARS,
may not take a driver skills examination or driver road examination for a provisional
license:
[(i)] 1. Sooner than the later of:
[1.] A. 3 months following the date that the individual first
obtains the learner’s instructional permit; or
[2.] B. 9 months following the most recent date the
individual was convicted of, or granted probation before judgment for, a moving violation;

HOUSE BILL 1353 9
[(ii)] 2. Until after successful completion of:
[1.] A. A standard driver education program approved
under Subtitle 5 of this title, consisting of at least 30 hours of classroom instruction and at
least 6 hours of highway driving instruction; and
[2.] B. At least 60 hours, 10 hours of which must occur
during the period beginning 30 minutes before sunset and ending 30 minutes after sunrise,
of behind–the–wheel driving practice supervised by an individual who:
[A.] I. Holds a valid driver’s license;
[B.] II. Is at least 21 years old; and
[C.] III. Has been licensed to drive for at least 3 years; and
[(iii)] 3. Unless the individual submits, in accordance with the
Administration’s regulations, a completed skills log book signed by each supervising driver
who certifies that the individual has satisfactorily demonstrated a required skill and has
completed the driving practice requirements under this paragraph.
16–111.2.
(a) (1) (I) When an applicant applies for an initial driver’s license or for a
class of driver’s license other than that which the applicant currently holds, the applicant
shall pay the Administration a license fee established by the Administration.
(II) This fee covers issuance of a learner’s instructional permit and,
if the applicant qualifies before the learner’s instructional permit expires, issuance of a
driver’s license or provisional license.
(2) If a learner’s instructional permit is not required, the applicant shall
pay the Administration, when the driver’s license is issued, a license fee established by the
Administration.
(3) If an appointment to take a driver’s license examination made by the
applicant is not kept, the Administration may charge the applicant a missed appointment
fee established by the Administration.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, for the renewal
of a noncommercial Class A, B, C, D, E, or M driver’s license, a licensee shall pay the
Administration a renewal fee established by the Administration.
(2) The Administration may not charge a licensee who is a recipient of the
Medal of Honor a fee for the renewal of the licensee’s noncommercial Class A, B, C, D, E,
or M driver’s license.

HOUSE BILL 1353
(c) For issuance of a duplicate or corrected noncommercial Class A, B, C, D, E, or
M driver’s license, a licensee shall pay the Administration a duplicate or corrected driver’s
license fee established by the Administration.
(d) For conversion of a provisional license to a driver’s license issued under §
16–111.1 of this subtitle, a licensee shall pay the Administration a fee established by the
Administration.
(e) A licensee shall pay a fee established by the Administration if the license is
issued or renewed under § 16–104.1 of this subtitle.
(f) (1) Whenever an applicant or licensee pays a fee required under subsection
(a)(1) or (2) or (b) of this section, the Administration shall offer the individual the option to
make a voluntary contribution of $1 to the Organ and Tissue Donation Awareness Fund
established under Title 13, Subtitle 9 of the Health – General Article.
(2) All moneys collected under this subsection shall be paid to the
Comptroller of the State and deposited into the Organ and Tissue Donation Awareness
Fund established under Title 13, Subtitle 9 of the Health – General Article.
(G) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN INCLUDES HOMELESS CHILDREN AND YOUTHS, AS DEFINED BY
THE FEDERAL MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION AND
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT IMPOSE ANY FEE UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE LICENSEE
OR APPLICANT IS A HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION
SHALL ACCEPT AS PROOF OF HOMELESSNESS A SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT FROM
A HOMELESS SERVICES PROVIDER LOCATED IN THE STATE OR, AS SPECIFIED IN THE
FEDERAL MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT, A LOCAL EDUCATIONAL
AGENCY LIAISON OR ANY DESIGNATED SCHOOL PERSONNEL THAT:
(I) AFFIRMS THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS HOMELESS; AND
(II) INCLUDES AN ADDRESS TO WHICH THE HOMELESS
INDIVIDUAL’S DRIVER’S LICENSE MAY BE SENT.
(4) A HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR A FEE FOR
ISSUANCE OF A DUPLICATE LICENSE.

HOUSE BILL 1353 11
(5) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION.
23–206.2.
(a) (1) A motor vehicle for which special registration plates have been issued
under § 13–616 of this article is exempt from the mandatory inspections required by this
subtitle if:
(i) All of the owners of the motor vehicle meet the disability
requirements of § 13–616(b)(1) of this article;
(ii) The motor vehicle is driven 5,000 miles or less annually; and
(iii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify the following:
(i) That the owner of the motor vehicle meets the disability
requirements of § 13–616(b)(1) of this article;
(ii) That the motor vehicle has been issued a special disabled
person’s registration number and special registration plates under § 13–616 of this article;
(iii) That the motor vehicle is driven 5,000 miles or less annually; and
(iv) The motor vehicle’s odometer reading at the time of the
certification.
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
(b) (1) A motor vehicle owned by an individual who is at least 70 years of age
at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle is exempt from the
mandatory inspections required by this subtitle if:
(i) All of the owners of the motor vehicle are at least 70 years of age
at the time of the scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle;
(ii) The motor vehicle is being driven 5,000 miles or less annually;
and
(iii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify the following:

HOUSE BILL 1353
(i) That all of the owners of the motor vehicle are at least 70 years
of age at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle;
(ii) That the motor vehicle is being driven 5,000 miles or less
annually; and
(iii) The motor vehicle’s odometer reading at the time of the
certification.
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
(c) (1) A motor vehicle owned by at least one active duty member of the
uniformed services at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle is
exempt from the mandatory inspections required by this subtitle if:
(i) An owner of the motor vehicle who is a member of the uniformed
services has received official orders:
1. For deployment outside the United States; or
2. To a duty station in a jurisdiction that is not subject to a
vehicle emissions control inspection and maintenance program; and
(ii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify that at least one owner of the motor
vehicle has received official orders for deployment outside the United States or to a duty
station in a jurisdiction that is not subject to a vehicle emissions control inspection and
maintenance program.
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
(d) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN INCLUDES HOMELESS CHILDREN AND YOUTHS, AS DEFINED BY
THE FEDERAL MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT.
(2) A MOTOR VEHICLE OWNED BY A HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL AT THE
TIME OF A SCHEDULED MANDATORY INSPECTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS EXEMPT
FROM THE MANDATORY INSPECTIONS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE IF THE
EXEMPTION IS NOT OTHERWISE PROHIBITED BY FEDERAL LAW.

HOUSE BILL 1353 13
(3) IN ORDER TO QUALIFY FOR AN EXEMPTION UNDER PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE SHALL PROVIDE
PROOF OF HOMELESSNESS BY SUBMITTING TO THE ADMINISTRATION A SIGNED
WRITTEN STATEMENT FROM A HOMELESS SERVICES PROVIDER LOCATED IN THE
STATE OR, AS SPECIFIED IN THE FEDERAL MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS
ASSISTANCE ACT, A LOCAL EDUCATIONAL AGENCY LIAISON OR ANY DESIGNATED
SCHOOL PERSONNEL THAT:
(I) AFFIRMS THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS HOMELESS; AND
(II) INCLUDES AN ADDRESS TO WHICH ANY CORRESPONDENCE
FROM THE ADMINISTRATION MAY BE SENT.
(E) The Administrator may adopt regulations as necessary to administer or
enforce the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2027, the Motor Vehicle Administration shall report to the House Environment and
Transportation Committee and the Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee on the number
and types of fees that the Administration did not impose on homeless individuals under §
16–111.2 of the Transportation Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, through October
1, 2027, as a result of this Act.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.